Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2330.04
Municipal county; duties.

The municipal county shall be responsible for making contributions and performing other duties and shall exercise the powers of a county under the County Employees Retirement Act with respect to the employees of the municipal county.

Laws 2001, LB 142, § 36.